Hawaii statutes.
§302L-4 Keiki first steps grant program;
establishment. (a) There is established, as part of the early learning
system, the keiki first steps grant program, to be developed by the office and
administered by the department of human services. The program shall increase
early learning opportunities that meet high standards of quality through the
awarding of grants to publicly- or privately-run:

(1) Center-based programs for three- and
four-year-old children; and

(2) Family child care programs, family-child
interaction learning programs, and other early learning programs and services
regardless of the age of children served.

(b) Eligibility criteria for grants. The
department of human services may award grants for the keiki first steps grant
program based on criteria that shall be developed by the office. The criteria
shall include the requirement that early learning programs and services meet
certain standards of quality, including:

(1) The implementation of evidence-based and
culturally responsive models of service delivery;

(2) The use of evidence-based curricula and methods;

(3) Minimum scheduling requirements, as follows:

(A) For center-based programs: providing
services for a full school day and full school year;

(B) For family child care programs:
providing services for three hours daily for a full school year;

(C) For family-child interaction learning
programs operating in classroom-like settings: providing early learning
activities at least twice a week for a full school year, and for a minimum of
three hours each day; and

(D) For home-based instruction programs:
providing early learning activities for no fewer than thirty weeks within a
school year;

(4) Staff-to-child ratios and group size that meet or
exceed nationally recommended standards;

(5) The employment of teachers and administrators who
meet the qualifications required by the office;

(6) The incorporation of preschool content standards
or other early learning guidelines;

(7) The implementation of health and developmental
screenings for children;

(8) Opportunities for parent or family engagement and
parent education and support; and

(9) Activities for monitoring and data collection to
evaluate early learning programs and services and inform best practices.

(c) Training; technical assistance;
monitoring. The department of human services may offer technical support to,
and shall be responsible for monitoring to ensure the accountability of
programs and services within the keiki first steps grant program, according to
the standards developed by the office. [L Sp 2008, c 14, pt of §2; am L 2012, c
178, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next